West Virginia, session 2026, SB164.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16. JOINT COMMISSION ON GOVERNMENT EFFICIENCY. §4-16-1. Creation and purpose. There is hereby created as a special joint commission of the Legislature the West Virginia Department of Government Efficiency (DOGE), which shall function as a temporary commission to identify opportunities for improving efficiency, reducing waste, and streamlining operations across state government. The commission shall conduct reviews, audits, and analyses of state agencies and programs, and provide recommendations for reforms. The commission's activities shall be limited to advisory and oversight functions and shall not include any regulatory or enforcement authority beyond what is expressly provided in this article. §4-16-2. Composition; appointments; qualifications; volunteers. The Joint Commission on Government Efficiency shall consist of:(1) Three members of the Senate, to be appointed by the President of the Senate;(2) Three members of the House of Delegates, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates; and(3) Five qualified individuals from the private sector, to be nominated by the Governor and then interviewed and confirmed by a majority vote of the legislative members of the commission.The private sector members shall be selected based on proof of having successfully run a business and a proven track record of managing a budget, eliminating waste, and helping the company operate more efficiently. Such qualifications shall be demonstrated through documentation, including but not limited to financial statements, business records, or affidavits from relevant parties.All members shall serve as volunteers without compensation, and no state funds shall be used for salaries, expenses, or any other costs associated with the commission. The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Delegates shall jointly designate a chair and vice-chair from among the legislative members. §4-16-3. Powers and duties. The Joint Commission on Government Efficiency shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To conduct audits, reviews, and evaluations of state agencies, departments, and programs to identify inefficiencies, redundancies, and opportunities for cost savings.(2) To request and review records, data, and information from state agencies necessary to fulfill its purpose.(3) To collaborate with other legislative committees, including but not limited to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance, to share findings and recommendations.(4) To submit interim reports to the Governor and the Legislature every six months and a final report no later than three months prior to the sunset date specified in §4-16-6 of this code.(5) To make recommendations for legislative or administrative changes to improve government efficiency, but without the authority to implement such changes directly. §4-16-4. Cooperation by state agencies; penalties for noncompliance. All state agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and offices shall fully cooperate with the Joint Commission on Government Efficiency by providing prompt access to all requested records, data, facilities, and personnel. Cooperation shall include, but not be limited to, granting full access for audits, interviews, and site visits. Any state agency that fails to comply with a reasonable request from the commission within thirty days shall be subject to the withholding of all appropriated funds for the following fiscal year, unless the Legislature expressly provides otherwise in the budget bill for that year. The commission shall notify the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Delegates of any noncompliance, and the State Auditor shall enforce the funding penalty upon certification of noncompliance by the commission. §4-16-5. No appropriation of funds. No new funds shall be appropriated by the Legislature for the creation, operation, or activities of the Joint Commission on Government Efficiency. All functions of the commission shall be performed using volunteer resources, and no state resources, including but not limited to office space, equipment, or personnel time, shall be allocated unless provided through existing appropriations without increase. §4-16-6. Sunset provision. The provisions of this article shall expire and have no further force or effect 18 months after the effective date of this act, unless extended by subsequent legislative enactment. Upon expiration, the Joint Commission on Government Efficiency shall cease operations, and any remaining records or reports shall be transferred to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance.